Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.170

Revenue bonds—Sale of—Other disposition.

Revenue bonds and warrants may be sold in any manner the city or town legislative body deems for the best interests of the city or town. The legislative body may provide in any contract for the construction or acquisition of a proposed utility that payment therefor shall be made only in revenue bonds and warrants at their par value.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.67.170. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-7, part.]